src/fst/stems/prefixes.lexc
!! # Prefixes
!  --------
!! Prefixes in the Paamese language are bound to beginning of other words.


!! ## Verbal prefixes

LEXICON Prefixes


Sg1+:na%> Mood ;
Sg2+:ko%> Mood ;
Sg3+:0%> Mood ;
Du1+Incl+:lo%> Mood ;
Du1+Excl+:malu%> Mood ;
Du2+:ko%> Mood ;
Du3+:lu%> Mood ;
Pauc1+Incl+:to%> Mood;
Pauc1+Excl+:matu%> Mood;
Pauc2+:mutu%> Mood;
Pauc3+:telu%> Mood;
Pl1+Incl+:ro%> Mood;
Pl1+Excl:ma%> Mood;
Pl2+:mu%> Mood;
Pl3+:a%> Mood;


!! Below are subject-mood prefixes so I sent them to Verbs (not Mood) (Simon)
!! I am not sure why we have ni+ at the beginning? (Simon)

ni+Sg1+Distal+:%>ni %> Verbs ;
ni+Sg2+Distal+:%>ki %> Verbs ;
ni+Sg3+Distal+:%>he %> Verbs ;
ni+Du1+Incl+Distal+:%>lehe %> Verbs ;
ni+Du1+Excl+Distal+:%>male %> Verbs ;
ni+Du2+Distal:%>mele%> Verbs;
ni+Du3+Distal+:%>lehe%> Verbs;
ni+Pauc1+Incl+Distal:%>tehe %> Verbs;
ni+Pauc1+Excl+Distal:%>mate %> Verbs;
ni+Pauc2+Distal:%>mete %> Verbs;
ni+Pauc3+Distal:%>tele %> Verbs;
ni+Pl1+Incl+Distal:%>rehe %> Verbs;
ni+Pl1+Excl+Distal:%>mahe %> Verbs;
ni+Pl2+Distal:%>mehe %> Verbs;
ni+Pl3+Distal:%>i %> Verbs;

ni+Sg1+Imp+:%>0 %> Verbs ;
ni+Sg2+Imp+:%>0 %> Verbs ;
ni+Sg3+Imp+:%>0 %> Verbs ;
ni+Du1+Incl+Imp+:%>lu %> Verbs ;
ni+Du1+Excl+Imp+:%>lu %> Verbs ;
ni+Du2+Imp:%>lu%> Verbs;
ni+Du3+Imp+:%>lu%> Verbs;
ni+Pauc1+Incl+Imp:%>telu %> Verbs;
ni+Pauc1+Excl+Imp:%>telu %> Verbs;
ni+Pauc2+Imp:%>telu %> Verbs;
ni+Pauc3+Imp:%>telu %> Verbs;
ni+Pl1+Incl+Imp:%>alu %> Verbs;
ni+Pl1+Excl+Imp:%>alu %> Verbs;
ni+Pl2+Imp:%>alu %> Verbs;
ni+Pl3+Imp:%>alu %> Verbs;


LEXICON Mood
Real+0%>: Verbs ;
Imm+:va%> Verbs ;
Pot+:na%> Verbs ;
Pro+:na%> Verbs;
Dist+
Imp+



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
